North Carolina statutes. Chapter 167. State Civil Air Patrol. [Repealed]
§§ 167-1 through 167-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 620, s. 9.

Cross References.

As to the State Civil Air Patrol generally, see G.S. 143B-1030 through 143B-1032.

Editor’s Note.

Sections 167-1 and 167-3 were repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 620, s. 9. Section 167-2 was repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 516, s. 6.